Utah statutes.
26-18-407.   Medicaid waiver for autism spectrum disorder.

(1)  For purposes of this section "autism spectrum disorder" means a pervasive developmental disorder as defined by the most recent edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual on Mental Disorders, including:

(a)  autistic disorder;

(b)  asperger's disorder; and

(c)  pervasive developmental disorder not otherwise specified.

(2)  The department shall, by July 1, 2012, apply for a Medicaid waiver with the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services within the United States Department of Health and Human Services to implement an autism spectrum disorders program within the state Medicaid program.

(3)  The autism spectrum disorders waiver program shall:

(a)  provide services to children between the ages of two years and six years with autism spectrum disorders;

(b)  accept applications for the program during periods of open enrollment;

(c)  initially provide services for up to 500 children, as funding permits;

(d)  convene a public process with the Department of Human Services to develop the benefits and services to include in the autism waiver program, including:

(i)  demonstrated effective treatments;

(ii)  methods to engage family members in the treatment process; and

(iii)  outreach to children in rural and underserved areas of the state; and

(e)  include a mechanism to evaluate the cost, effectiveness, and outcomes of the different services provided as part of the autism waiver program.

(4)  The department shall report to the Legislature's Health and Human Services Interim Committee by November 30, 2013, and prior to each November 30 thereafter while the waiver is in effect regarding:

(a)  the number of children diagnosed with autism spectrum disorder and the number of children served under the waiver;

(b)  success involving families in supporting treatment plans for autistic children;

(c)  the cost of the autism waiver program; and

(d)  the outcomes and effectiveness of the services offered by the autism waiver program.

